District of Columbia statutes.
31-3409

Information to enrollees.

(a)

A health maintenance organization shall provide to its enrollees a list of providers, upon enrollment and re-enrollment.

(b)

Every health maintenance organization shall provide to its enrollees within 30 days notice of any material change in the operation of the organization that will affect them directly.

(c)

An enrollee must be notified in writing by a health maintenance organization of the termination of the primary care provider who provided health care services to that enrollee. A health maintenance organization shall provide assistance to the enrollee in transferring to another participating primary care provider.

(d)

A health maintenance organization shall provide to enrollees information on how services may be obtained, where additional information on access to services can be obtained, and a number where the enrollee can contact the HMO at no cost to the enrollee.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-235, § 10, 44 DCR 818
1981 Ed., § 35-4509.